Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 3

Branding of Timber

43-28-301. Branding authorized — “Timber” defined.

Any person, firm, or corporation dealing in timber is authorized to adopt a brand in the manner and with the effect provided by this part.

For the purposes of this part, “timber” means and includes trees, whether standing, lying down, or prepared for sale, sawlogs and other logs, cross and railroad ties, boards, planks, staves and headings, and all other timber cut or prepared for market.

Acts 1901, ch. 54, § 1; Shan., § 3608a78; Code 1932, § 6771; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 68-301.

Cross-References. Allocation of net receipts of timber during administration of trust, § 35-6-412.

Burglary of timber, § 39-14-410.

Cutting timber as adverse possession, § 28-2-101.

Leaving fire near woodland unattended, § 39-14-305.

Sale of timber as surplus personal property, § 12-2-112.

State forests, title 11, ch. 4.

Statewide uniformity of harvest or severance taxes, § 67-1-111.

Tax lien, protection of timber, title 67, ch. 5, part 23.

Timber harvesting, § 69-3-138.

Timber on land subject to redemption, waste, § 66-8-104.

Vehicles hauling timber, pulpwood or logs, securing of loads, § 55-7-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Trees and Timber, § 2.

Collateral References. Logging
36.

43-28-302. Notice of brand — Form — Acknowledgment — Recording — Copy posted.

Every timber dealer desiring to adopt a brand may do so by the execution of a writing in form and effect as follows:

Brand notice is hereby given that I (or we, as the case may be) have adopted the following brand in my (or our, etc.) business as timber dealer or dealers, to wit: (here insert the word, letters, figures, etc., constituting the brand, or if it be any device other than the words, letters, or figures, insert the facsimile thereof). Dated this day of , A. D. .

The writing shall be acknowledged or proven for record in the same manner as deeds are acknowledged or proven, and shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk in which the principal office or place of business of the timber dealer may be. A copy thereof shall be posted up at the place where the principal business is done, and one (1) at the courthouse door in the county where the business is carried on, and at three (3) public places in the county.

Acts 1901, ch. 54, § 2; Shan., § 3608a79; Code 1932, § 6772; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 68-302.

43-28-303. Certificate of registration required.

Before any person, firm, or corporation can claim protection under its brands, the same shall be registered in the county of its residence, and a certificate of registration issued to those registering brand.

Acts 1901, ch. 54, § 11; Shan., § 3608a88; Code 1932, § 6781; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 68-303.

43-28-304. Brand becomes trademark — Infringement — Penalty — Damages.

Every brand adopted pursuant to this part shall be the exclusive trademark of the person, firm or corporation adopting the brand, and any other person, firm or corporation knowingly using or attempting to use that brand without the written consent of the owner commits a Class C misdemeanor, and is liable to the owner of the brand for all damages sustained by the owner by reason of the use of the brand.

Acts 1901, ch. 54, § 3; Shan., § 3608a80; Code 1932, § 6773; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 68-304; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-28-305. Brand to be plainly stamped.

The proprietor of the brand shall, in using the brand, cause it to be plainly stamped, branded, or otherwise impressed upon each piece of timber upon which the brand is placed.

Acts 1901, ch. 54, § 4; Shan., § 3608a81; Code 1932, § 6774; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 68-305.

43-28-306. Fraudulently placing brand on another's timber — Penalty.

A person who fraudulently places any brand on timber not belonging to that person, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1901, ch. 54, § 5; Shan., § 3608a82; Code 1932, § 6775; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 68-306; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-28-307. Unlawfully obliterating brand — Penalty.

Any person or persons who unlawfully cut out, cancel, obliterate, or deface any brand recorded as provided in this part that has been placed on any timber of another in this state commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1901, ch. 54, § 6; Shan., § 3608a83; Code 1932, § 6776; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 68-307; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 36.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

43-28-308. Taking, concealing, destroying or converting branded timber — Penalty.

Any person who unlawfully takes, secretes, cuts, saws, splits up, or destroys any timber branded as provided in this part, or removes branded timber from the river or place on which the timber has been placed, with the intent to prevent the owner or owners from finding the timber, or in any way converts the timber to such person's use without the consent of the owner, or who receives the timber knowing it to have been stolen, commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1901, ch. 54, § 7; Shan., § 3608a84; Code 1932, § 6777; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 68-308; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 37.

Cross-References. Deceptive business practices, § 39-14-127.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

Timber, § 39-14-410.

Vandalism, § 39-14-408.

43-28-309. Contract of sale of standing trees or timber so branded must be in writing.

No contract for the sale of standing trees or standing timber when so branded shall be enforceable by action unless the contract or some memorandum thereof be in writing, signed by the person selling same or the person's duly authorized agent.

Acts 1901, ch. 54, § 8; Shan., § 3608a85; Code 1932, § 6778; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 68-309.

43-28-310. Purchaser's brand put on timber by seller vests title in purchaser — Rights as to purchase money unaffected.

Whenever any timber is branded by the seller or another with the seller's consent, with the brand of the purchaser or other person, corporation or firm, then the title to the timber shall at once pass to the person, corporation or firm whose brand is placed upon it, but this shall not affect the rights of contracting parties with respect to the payment of the purchase money for the timber.

Acts 1901, ch. 54, § 9; Shan., § 3608a86; Code 1932, § 6779; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 68-310.

43-28-311. Brands and trade-marks under previous law unaffected.

Nothing in this part shall affect the validity and effect of all timber brands and trademarks that have been duly adopted and recorded under the law in force previous to April 20, 1901, but the timber brands and trademarks shall be as valid for all purposes, civil and criminal, as if duly adopted and recorded under this part.

Acts 1901, ch. 54, § 10; Shan., § 3608a87; Code 1932, § 6780; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 68-311.

43-28-312. Cutting timber from property of another — Civil liability.

Civil liability for the negligent cutting of timber from the property of another is in an amount double that of the current market value of the timber.

If the timber is negligently cut from the property of another because the landowner for whom the timber is being cut has marked or designated the boundary of the landowner's property incorrectly, then the landowner is jointly liable for the double damages.

Civil liability for knowingly and intentionally cutting timber from the property of another is in an amount treble that of the current market value of the timber.

Nothing in this section precludes an owner of property on which timber has been cut by another from recovering damages for loss of value other than commercial timber value, if any, of the timber negligently or intentionally cut.

“Current market value,” as used in this section, applies to the property in question that is standing timber; therefore, the current market value is that of the timber before being cut.

Acts 1991, ch. 455, § 1; 1992, ch. 875, § 1.

43-28-313. Tennessee Native Species Lumber Act.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Native Species Lumber Act.”

As used in this section:

“Agricultural building” means any structure used primarily for agricultural purposes or for forest product production;

“Commercial sawmill” means any type of sawmill that produces lumber for sale;

“End user” means any person who purchases native lumber from a commercial sawmill for the purpose of residential construction;

“Grader” means the owner of a commercial sawmill, or the owner's designated employee, who has visually inspected each piece of lumber; and

“Native timber” means any hardwood or softwood species growing within the borders of this state.

The operator of any commercial sawmill that is certified to grade lumber pursuant to subsection (d) may, when requested by the end user of the native lumber, certify in writing to the purchaser that the quality and safe working stresses of the lumber are equal to or better than No. 2 grade, in accordance with the conditions set forth in the American Softwood Standard PS 20-70 of the United States department of commerce, as amended; provided, that the minimum grade of lumber used in load-bearing wall members shall be stud grade.

The certification provided pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) shall include:

The name of the wood species;

The quantity of wood certified;

The location where the wood is to be used;

Whether or not the wood is seasoned;

The name of the commercial sawmill where the wood was cut;

The name of the grader; and

The date on which the wood was cut at the commercial sawmill and graded.

Upon the request of the local building official, the end user shall provide written certification of the quality and safe working stresses of the native lumber provided by the commercial sawmill operator pursuant to subdivision (c)(1), as part of the building permit application.

The certification provided pursuant to subdivision (c)(3)(A) shall be accepted by code officials in lieu of any grade stamp requirements.

The University of Tennessee shall, through its agriculture extension service, offer a course in grading lumber to owners of commercial sawmills and the owners' designated employees. Any person who successfully completes the lumber grading course will be issued a certificate that entitles the certificate holder to grade lumber pursuant to this section. The course shall be offered biannually in each of the three (3) grand divisions of this state.

The department of agriculture shall promulgate rules to implement and administer the certification program created by subdivision (c)(1), including, but not limited to, establishing a course fee in an amount sufficient to defray the cost of implementing and administering the certification program.

Any person who uses the native timber harvested from and used entirely on the person's own property shall, if required, certify that the lumber meets the requirements of any building codes.

No certification of native lumber shall be required in the construction of an agricultural building.

Acts 2016, ch. 1071, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1071, § 2. May 20, 2016.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.